Massachusetts, session 194th, S1920.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting in line 297, after the word "Authority;" the following:- “any police
officer employed at a Massachusetts state college, university, community college and the
University of Massachusetts”.
of 1